Illinois, session 104th, HB5236.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Digital Library Protection Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Aggregator" means any person in the business of licensing 8access to electronic literary material collections that 9include electronic literary material from multiple publishers.10    "Borrower" means any person or organization, including 11another library, to whom a library loans a copy of electronic 12literary material.13    "Digital audiobook" means a sound recording of a reading 14of any literary production that has been converted into or 15published in a digital audio file that may be listened to on a 16computer or portable electronic device.17    "Electronic literary material" means any digital audiobook 18or electronic book.19    "Electronic book" means a text document that has been 20converted into or published in a digital format that may be 21read on a computer or portable electronic device.22    "Library" means a public library, public elementary school 23or secondary school library, academic library, research   HB5236 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 18368 SPS 31808 b1library, special library, library consortium, talking book 2library, or an archive.3    "Loan" means the creation and transmission by a library to 4a borrower of a copy of any electronic literary material and 5the deletion of the copy by the library upon the expiration of 6the loan period.7    "Loan period" means the period of time commencing with the 8creation and transmission by a library to a borrower of a copy 9of any electronic literary material and concluding with the 10deletion of the copy by the library, as determined by the 11library. 12    "Publisher" means (i) any person in the business of the 13manufacture, distribution, licensing, or sale of books, 14audiobooks, journals, magazines, newspapers, or other literary 15productions, including electronic literary materials, and (ii) 16any aggregator who enters into a contract with any library for 17the purpose of providing materials for purchase or license 18from any publisher.19    "Technological protection measure" means any technology 20that enhances the security of loaning or circulating 21electronic literary materials by a library. 22    Section 10. Contracts between libraries and publishers. No 23library shall enter into a contract or license agreement to 24distribute electronic literary materials to the library if the 25contract or agreement:  HB5236 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 18368 SPS 31808 b1        (1) restricts the library from performing customary 2    operational functions, including any provision that:3            (A) restricts the library from licensing 4        electronic literary materials from publishers;5            (B) restricts the library from employing 6        technological protection measures as necessary to loan 7        electronic literary materials;8            (C) restricts the library from making preservation 9        copies of electronic literary materials; or10            (D) restricts the library from loaning electronic 11        literary materials through interlibrary loan systems;12        (2) restricts the library from performing customary 13    lending functions, including any provision that:14            (A) restricts the library from loaning electronic 15        literary materials to borrowers;16            (B) restricts the library from determining loan 17        periods for licensed electronic literary materials;18            (C) requires the library to acquire a license for 19        any electronic literary material at a price greater 20        than that charged to the public for the same item;21            (D) restricts the number of licenses for 22        electronic literary materials that the library may 23        acquire after the same item is made available to the 24        public;25            (E) requires the library to pay a 26        cost-per-circulation fee to loan electronic literary   HB5236 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 18368 SPS 31808 b1        materials, unless the fee is substantially lower in 2        aggregate than the cost of purchasing the item 3        outright;4            (F) restricts the number of times the library may 5        loan any electronic literary material over the course 6        of the contract or license agreement if the contract 7        or agreement also imposes a time-based limitation on 8        the duration of the library's license to the 9        materials; or10            (G) restricts or limits the library's ability to 11        virtually recite text or display artwork to library 12        patrons so that the materials would not have the same 13        educational utility as when recited or displayed at a 14        library facility;15        (3) restricts the library from disclosing the terms of 16    the contract or license agreement to any other library in 17    this State; or18        (4) requires, coerces, or enables the library to 19    violate the Library Records Confidentiality Act. 20    Section 15. Applicability; governing law; forum. 21    (a) This Act applies to any contract or license agreement 22to distribute electronic literary materials to:23        (1) a library located in this State; or24        (2) a library consortium acting on behalf of one or 25    more libraries located in this State.  HB5236 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 18368 SPS 31808 b1    (b) A contract or license agreement subject to this Act, 2and any dispute arising out of or relating to the contract or 3license agreement, is governed by and shall be construed in 4accordance with the laws of this State, without regard to 5conflict of laws principles.6    (c) A provision in a contract or license agreement subject 7to this Act that requires the application of the law of another 8jurisdiction or requires a library to bring or defend an 9action in a forum outside this State is contrary to the public 10policy of this State and is unenforceable and void.11    (d) This Section does not apply to any existing contract 12described in Section 25. 13    Section 20. Unenforceable contracts. Any contract to 14license electronic literary materials to a library is deemed 15unenforceable and void if the contract includes a provision 16prohibited under this Act. Any provision of a contract that 17waives any of the provisions of this Act is deemed 18unenforceable and void. 19    Section 25. Existing contracts. Nothing in this Act shall 20be construed to apply to any contract to distribute electronic 21literary materials to a library entered into prior to the 22effective date of this Act. 23    Section 30. Relation to other laws. Nothing in this Act   HB5236 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 18368 SPS 31808 b1shall be construed to limit the authority of the Secretary of 2State under the License to Read Act. 3    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 4severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. If 5any provision of this Act or its application to any person or 6circumstance is held invalid, that invalidity does not affect 7any other provision or application of this Act that can be 8given effect without the invalid provision or application. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.